Maine, session 132, LD1214.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §401, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2013, c. 15, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Appointment. The state board consists of 9 members and, beginning in the 2007-
2008 school year, 2 nonvoting student members, one junior and one senior in high school.
All members are appointed by the Governor. Four members must reside in the State's First
Congressional District at the time of appointment, 4 members must reside in the State's
Second Congressional District Acadia at the time of appointment and one member may
reside in either the First Congressional District or the Second Congressional District Acadia
at the time of appointment. One of the student members must attend school in the State's
First Congressional District at the time of appointment and the other student member must
attend school in the State's Second Congressional District Acadia at the time of
appointment. Each appointment is subject to review by the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters and to confirmation by the Senate.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §1205-A, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 552, Pt. C, §1, is
amended to read:
2. Second District Acadia. The Second District Acadia consists of the counties of
Androscoggin, Aroostook, Franklin, Hancock, Oxford, Penobscot, Piscataquis, Somerset,
Waldo and Washington and the following municipalities and areas within Kennebec
County: Augusta, Belgrade, Chelsea, Farmingdale, Fayette, Gardiner, Hallowell,
Manchester, Monmouth, Mount Vernon, Oakland, Randolph, Readfield, Rome, Sidney,
Vienna, Wayne and Winthrop.